Missouri, session 2026, SB925.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 41.430, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 41.430,
to read as follows:
41.430. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as "The Supporting Missouri Servicemen and Women Act".
2. Officers, warrant officers and enlisted personnel
of the organized militia on active duty in the service of
the state shall receive as compensation the same pay,
longevity, and allowances as are or may be provided for
members of like grade and branch of service in the Armed
Forces of the United States[.], except:
(1) Members of the organized militia serving on active
duty shall receive as a minimum the daily rate equivalent to
the grade level of E5 with maximum longevity and with
dependents;
(2) Members of the organized militia serving on active
duty in service of the state for more than thirty days shall
receive a monthly allowance for any premiums for coverage of
the member under the TRICARE program of the United States
Department of Defense or under any other government-
sponsored insurance program during the period of active duty.
1